Massachusetts, session 194th, H1008.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 92 of the General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after section 34D the
following section:-
“Section 34E: Notwithstanding any general or special law or administrative bulletin to
the contrary and pursuant to section 34, there is hereby established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund, to be known as the Manuel F. Correllus State Forest Trust Fund,
which shall be used for the purposes of advancing recreational, educational and conservation
interests, including, but not limited to, the construction and maintenance of facilities and
infrastructure improvements for the area within the forest complex. The trust shall receive, hold
and expend all fees generated by permits, licenses, easements, and all other agreements not
currently being directed to the General Fund relating to the use of the forest complex land as
authorized by the commission. The department shall not make expenditures from this fund so as
to cause the fund to be deficient.”
of 1